fi/fi_FI.aff
FLAG num
PFX 45822 Y 1
PFX 45822 yskä yskän .
SFX 45823 Y 1
SFX 45823 0 t .
PFX 45823 Y 1
PFX 45823 yskä yskän .
PFX 45824 N 1
PFX 45824 yskä yskän .
SFX 45825 Y 1
SFX 45825 0 a .
PFX 45825 Y 1
PFX 45825 yskä yskän .
SFX 45826 Y 1
SFX 45826 0 an .
PFX 45826 Y 1
PFX 45826 yskä yskän .
SFX 45827 N 1
SFX 45827 si nikin .
SFX 45828 N 1
SFX 45828 ä iksemme .
SFX 45829 N 1
SFX 45829 ä iksenne .
SFX 45830 N 1
SFX 45830 ä iksesi .
SFX 45831 N 1
SFX 45831 ä illeenkin .
SFX 45832 N 1
SFX 45832 0 tär .
SFX 45833 N 1
SFX 45833 äinen iimme .
SFX 45834 N 1
SFX 45834 äinen iisi .
SFX 45835 N 1
SFX 45835 älle illeenkään .
SFX 45836 N 1
SFX 45836 älle illenikin .
SFX 45837 N 1
SFX 45837 älle illenikään .
SFX 45838 N 1
SFX 45838 ällä illäsi .
SFX 45839 N 1
SFX 45839 ältä iltämme .
SFX 45840 N 1
SFX 45840 ältä iltäni .
SFX 45841 N 1
SFX 45841 ältä iltäsi .
SFX 45842 N 1
SFX 45842 tä länikin .
SFX 45843 N 1
SFX 45843 ä iväkin .
SFX 45844 Y 1
SFX 45844 s ksen .
PFX 45844 Y 1
PFX 45844 ystävä ystävän .
SFX 45845 Y 1
SFX 45845 s ksena .
PFX 45845 Y 1
PFX 45845 ystävä ystävän .
SFX 45846 Y 1
SFX 45846 s ksia .
PFX 45846 Y 1
PFX 45846 ystävä ystävän .
PFX 45847 N 1
PFX 45847 ystävä ystävän .
SFX 45848 N 1
SFX 45848 ää iähän .
SFX 45849 N 1
SFX 45849 ää iäänkin .
SFX 45850 N 1
SFX 45850 ään iämme .
SFX 45851 N 1
SFX 45851 ö 0 .
SFX 45852 N 1
SFX 45852 ö ltä .
SFX 45853 N 1
SFX 45853 ö mmälle .
SFX 45854 N 1
SFX 45854 ö mmälleen .
SFX 45855 N 1
SFX 45855 ö äk .
SFX 45856 Y 1
SFX 45856 0 iden .
PFX 45856 Y 1
PFX 45856 y 0 .
SFX 45857 Y 1
SFX 45857 0 idenkin .
PFX 45857 Y 1
PFX 45857 y 0 .
SFX 45858 Y 1
SFX 45858 0 ihin .
PFX 45858 Y 1
PFX 45858 y 0 .
SFX 45859 Y 1
SFX 45859 0 ihinkin .
PFX 45859 Y 1
PFX 45859 y 0 .
SFX 45860 Y 1
SFX 45860 0 iksi .
PFX 45860 Y 1
PFX 45860 y 0 .
SFX 45861 Y 1
SFX 45861 0 ille .
PFX 45861 Y 1
PFX 45861 y 0 .
SFX 45862 Y 1
SFX 45862 0 illä .
PFX 45862 Y 1
PFX 45862 y 0 .
SFX 45863 Y 1
SFX 45863 0 iltä .
PFX 45863 Y 1
PFX 45863 y 0 .
SFX 45864 Y 1
SFX 45864 0 in .
PFX 45864 Y 1
PFX 45864 y 0 .
SFX 45865 Y 1
SFX 45865 0 ineen .
PFX 45865 Y 1
PFX 45865 y 0 .
SFX 45866 Y 1
SFX 45866 0 inä .
PFX 45866 Y 1
PFX 45866 y 0 .
SFX 45867 Y 1
SFX 45867 0 isin .
PFX 45867 Y 1
PFX 45867 y 0 .
SFX 45868 Y 1
SFX 45868 0 issä .
PFX 45868 Y 1
PFX 45868 y 0 .
SFX 45869 Y 1
SFX 45869 0 istä .
PFX 45869 Y 1
PFX 45869 y 0 .
SFX 45870 Y 1
SFX 45870 0 istäkin .
PFX 45870 Y 1
PFX 45870 y 0 .
SFX 45871 Y 1
SFX 45871 0 istämme .
PFX 45871 Y 1
PFX 45871 y 0 .
SFX 45872 Y 1
SFX 45872 0 istäni .
PFX 45872 Y 1
PFX 45872 y 0 .
SFX 45873 Y 1
SFX 45873 0 istään .
PFX 45873 Y 1
PFX 45873 y 0 .
SFX 45874 Y 1
SFX 45874 0 itten .
PFX 45874 Y 1
PFX 45874 y 0 .
SFX 45875 Y 1
SFX 45875 0 itä .
PFX 45875 Y 1
PFX 45875 y 0 .
SFX 45876 Y 1
SFX 45876 0 itäkin .
PFX 45876 Y 1
PFX 45876 y 0 .
SFX 45877 Y 1
SFX 45877 0 itäkään .
PFX 45877 Y 1
PFX 45877 y 0 .
SFX 45878 Y 1
SFX 45878 0 itämme .
PFX 45878 Y 1
PFX 45878 y 0 .
SFX 45879 Y 1
SFX 45879 0 itäni .
PFX 45879 Y 1
PFX 45879 y 0 .
SFX 45880 Y 1
SFX 45880 0 itänsä .
PFX 45880 Y 1
PFX 45880 y 0 .
SFX 45881 Y 1
SFX 45881 0 itäsi .
PFX 45881 Y 1
PFX 45881 y 0 .
SFX 45882 Y 1
SFX 45882 0 itään .
PFX 45882 Y 1
PFX 45882 y 0 .
SFX 45883 N 1
SFX 45883 pyä vyttyämme .
SFX 45884 Y 1
SFX 45884 si iden .
PFX 45884 Y 1
PFX 45884 y 0 .
SFX 45885 Y 1
SFX 45885 i en .
PFX 45885 Y 1
PFX 45885 Ä ä .
PFX 45886 N 1
PFX 45886 Ä ä .
SFX 45887 Y 1
SFX 45887 0 lle .
PFX 45887 Y 1
PFX 45887 Ä ä .
SFX 45888 Y 1
SFX 45888 0 llä .
PFX 45888 Y 1
PFX 45888 Ä ä .
SFX 45889 Y 1
SFX 45889 0 än .
PFX 45889 Y 1
PFX 45889 Ä ä .
SFX 45890 Y 1
SFX 45890 0 lta .
PFX 45890 Y 1
PFX 45890 Ä ä .
SFX 45891 N 1
SFX 45891 lä LÄ .
SFX 45892 Y 1
SFX 45892 0 n .
PFX 45892 Y 1
PFX 45892 0 h .
SFX 45893 N 1
SFX 45893 0 äntä .
SFX 45894 N 1
SFX 45894 tää lettyäni .
SFX 45895 N 1
SFX 45895 n lläni .
SFX 45896 N 1
SFX 45896 n llänne .
SFX 45897 N 1
SFX 45897 ti deillekin .
SFX 45898 N 1
SFX 45898 ti deillenne .
SFX 45899 N 1
SFX 45899 ti deillään .
SFX 45900 N 1
SFX 45900 ti deiltä .
SFX 45901 N 1
SFX 45901 ti deiltämme .
SFX 45902 N 1
SFX 45902 ti deiltään .
SFX 45903 N 1
SFX 45903 ti deistäkin .
SFX 45904 N 1
SFX 45904 ti deistään .
SFX 45905 N 1
SFX 45905 ti diksikin .
SFX 45906 N 1
SFX 45906 ti dillekään .
SFX 45907 N 1
SFX 45907 ti dillenne .
SFX 45908 N 1
SFX 45908 ti dillensä .
SFX 45909 N 1
SFX 45909 ti dillähän .
SFX 45910 N 1
SFX 45910 ti dilläkään .
SFX 45911 N 1
SFX 45911 ti dillänsä .
SFX 45912 N 1
SFX 45912 ti dilläsi .
SFX 45913 N 1
SFX 45913 ti diltäkin .
SFX 45914 N 1
SFX 45914 ti diltäkään .
SFX 45915 N 1
SFX 45915 ti diltämme .
SFX 45916 N 1
SFX 45916 ti diltänne .
SFX 45917 N 1
SFX 45917 ti diltänsä .
SFX 45918 N 1
SFX 45918 ti diltäsi .
SFX 45919 N 1
SFX 45919 ti dinhän .
SFX 45920 N 1
SFX 45920 ti dinkään .
SFX 45921 N 1
SFX 45921 ti dissäsi .
SFX 45922 N 1
SFX 45922 ti distäkään .
SFX 45923 N 1
SFX 45923 ti distänne .
SFX 45924 N 1
SFX 45924 ti distänsä .
SFX 45925 N 1
SFX 45925 ti dithän .
SFX 45926 N 1
SFX 45926 ti ditkään .
SFX 45927 N 1
SFX 45927 ti dittä .
SFX 45928 Y 1
SFX 45928 0 ksi .
PFX 45928 Y 1
PFX 45928 äiti äitien .
SFX 45929 Y 1
SFX 45929 0 lle .
PFX 45929 Y 1
PFX 45929 äiti äitien .
SFX 45930 Y 1
SFX 45930 0 n .
PFX 45930 Y 1
PFX 45930 äiti äitien .
SFX 45931 Y 1
SFX 45931 0 stä .
PFX 45931 Y 1
PFX 45931 äiti äitien .
PFX 45932 N 1
PFX 45932 äiti äitien .
SFX 45933 Y 1
SFX 45933 i eilla .
PFX 45933 Y 1
PFX 45933 äiti äitien .
SFX 45934 Y 1
SFX 45934 i eille .
PFX 45934 Y 1
PFX 45934 äiti äitien .
SFX 45935 Y 1
SFX 45935 0 lla .
PFX 45935 Y 1
PFX 45935 äiti äitien .
SFX 45936 Y 1
SFX 45936 0 t .
PFX 45936 Y 1
PFX 45936 äiti äitien .
SFX 45937 Y 1
SFX 45937 0 a .
PFX 45937 Y 1
PFX 45937 äiti äitien .
SFX 45938 Y 1
SFX 45938 0 un .
PFX 45938 Y 1
PFX 45938 äiti äitien .
SFX 45939 Y 1
SFX 45939 ku uksi .
PFX 45939 Y 1
PFX 45939 äiti äitien .
SFX 45940 Y 1
SFX 45940 ku un .
PFX 45940 Y 1
PFX 45940 äiti äitien .
SFX 45941 Y 1
SFX 45941 ku usta .
PFX 45941 Y 1
PFX 45941 äiti äitien .
SFX 45942 Y 1
SFX 45942 ku ut .
PFX 45942 Y 1
PFX 45942 äiti äitien .
SFX 45943 Y 1
SFX 45943 ti it .
PFX 45943 Y 1
PFX 45943 äiti äitien .
SFX 45944 Y 1
SFX 45944 ka an .
PFX 45944 Y 1
PFX 45944 äiti äitien .
SFX 45945 Y 1
SFX 45945 ka at .
PFX 45945 Y 1
PFX 45945 äiti äitien .
SFX 45946 Y 1
SFX 45946 a oiksi .
PFX 45946 Y 1
PFX 45946 äiti äitien .
SFX 45947 Y 1
SFX 45947 a oista .
PFX 45947 Y 1
PFX 45947 äiti äitien .
SFX 45948 Y 1
SFX 45948 ko olla .
PFX 45948 Y 1
PFX 45948 äiti äitien .
SFX 45949 Y 1
SFX 45949 pu uksi .
PFX 45949 Y 1
PFX 45949 äiti äitien .
PFX 45950 N 1
PFX 45950 äi äidyt .
SFX 45951 N 1
SFX 45951 keä 0 .
SFX 45952 N 1
SFX 45952 ä päältä .
SFX 45953 N 1
SFX 45953 n käs .
SFX 45954 N 1
SFX 45954 n meltasi .
SFX 45955 N 1
SFX 45955 tä ämähän .
SFX 45956 N 1
SFX 45956 ä käs .
SFX 45957 N 1
SFX 45957 keä gettiin .
SFX 45958 N 1
SFX 45958 keä getty .
SFX 45959 N 1
SFX 45959 keä gettyjä .
SFX 45960 N 1
SFX 45960 keä gettynä .
SFX 45961 N 1
SFX 45961 keä gettyä .
SFX 45962 N 1
SFX 45962 keä gettäisiin .
SFX 45963 N 1
SFX 45963 keä gettävä .
SFX 45964 N 1
SFX 45964 keä getyistä .
SFX 45965 N 1
SFX 45965 keä getyn .
SFX 45966 N 1
SFX 45966 keä getyssä .
SFX 45967 N 1
SFX 45967 keä getyt .
SFX 45968 N 1
SFX 45968 keä getä .
SFX 45969 N 1
SFX 45969 keä getään .
SFX 45970 N 1
SFX 45970 nen säksi .
SFX 45971 N 1
SFX 45971 ä isänä .
SFX 45972 N 1
SFX 45972 n kosken .
SFX 45973 N 1
SFX 45973 0 vy .
SFX 45974 N 1
SFX 45974 0 vyyn .
SFX 45975 N 1
SFX 45975 0 vyä .
SFX 45976 N 1
SFX 45976 0 jikseen .
SFX 45977 N 1
SFX 45977 ää ettäväksenne .
SFX 45978 N 1
SFX 45978 i ekkäin .
SFX 45979 N 1
SFX 45979 i täessä .
SFX 45980 N 1
SFX 45980 inen ten .
SFX 45981 N 1
SFX 45981 ne teitäni .
SFX 45982 Y 1
SFX 45982 s desta .
PFX 45982 Y 1
PFX 45982 ääni äänen .
SFX 45983 N 1
SFX 45983 n moiden .
SFX 45984 N 1
SFX 45984 0 ljy .
PFX 45985 N 1
PFX 45985 öljy öljyn .
SFX 45986 Y 1
SFX 45986 0 n .
PFX 45986 Y 1
PFX 45986 öljy öljyn .
SFX 45987 Y 1
SFX 45987 0 t .
PFX 45987 Y 1
PFX 45987 öljy öljyn .
SFX 45988 Y 1
SFX 45988 s ksen .
PFX 45988 Y 1
PFX 45988 öljy öljyn .
SFX 45989 Y 1
SFX 45989 s ksessa .
PFX 45989 Y 1
PFX 45989 öljy öljyn .
SFX 45990 Y 1
SFX 45990 s tta .
PFX 45990 Y 1
PFX 45990 öljy öljyn .
SFX 45991 Y 1
SFX 45991 ta an .
PFX 45991 Y 1
PFX 45991 öljy öljyn .
